Vermont, session 2025-2026, H737.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6001 is amended to read:
§ 6001. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(3)(A) “Development” means each of the following:
* * *
(iv) The construction of housing projects such as cooperatives,
condominiums, or dwellings, or construction or maintenance of mobile homes
or mobile home parks, with 10 25 or more units, constructed or maintained on
a tract or tracts of land, owned or controlled by a person, within a radius of five
VT LEG #385171 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.737
2026 Page 2 of 4
miles of any point on any involved land and within any continuous period of
five years. However:
* * *
(xii) The construction of a road or roads and any associated
driveways to provide access to or within a tract of land owned or controlled by
a person. For the purposes of determining jurisdiction under this subdivision
(xii), any new development or subdivision on a parcel of land that will be
provided access by the road and associated driveways is land involved in the
construction of the road.
* * *
(IV) This subdivision (xii) shall not apply to:
(aa) a State or municipal road, a utility corridor of an
electric transmission or distribution company, or a road used primarily for
farming or forestry purposes;
(bb) development within a Tier 1A area established in
accordance with section 6034 of this title or a Tier 1B area established in
accordance with section 6033 of this title; and
(cc) improvements underway when this section takes effect
to a Class 4 highway that will be transferred to the municipality.
VT LEG #385171 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.737
2026 Page 3 of 4
(V) The conversion of a road used for farming or forestry
purposes that also meets the requirements of this subdivision (xii) shall
constitute development.
(VI) The intent of this subdivision (xii) is to encourage the
design of clustered subdivisions and development that does not fragment Tier 2
areas or Tier 3 areas.
(VII) A municipality may be exempt from this subdivision (xii)
if the legislative body of the municipality objects to its use because its use
would result in inappropriate development close to roads, or where the use of
agricultural land might be adversely affected.
* * *
(46) “Tier 3” means an area consisting of critical natural resources
defined by the rules of the Board. Tier 3 shall not include any portion of land
in a municipality that the town plan has designated as suitable for housing,
absent clear and convincing evidence that critical natural resources will be
significantly harmed by the development of housing in those portions of land,
and that the benefits of preserving those critical natural resources outweigh the
benefits of developing more housing to meet Vermont’s housing needs. The
Board’s rules shall at a minimum determine whether and how to protect river
corridors, headwater streams, habitat connectors of statewide significance,
VT LEG #385171 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.737
2026 Page 4 of 4
riparian areas, class A waters, natural communities, and other critical natural
resources.
* * *
Sec. 2. RULEMAKING; ROAD RULE
On or before July 1, 2027, the Land Use Review Board shall submit to the
Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules proposed final rules based on
10 V.S.A. § 6001(3)(A)(xii)(VII) regarding how municipalities can object to
road jurisdiction.
Sec. 3. 24 V.S.A. § 4348a(a)(12)(I) is amended to read:
(I) Rural; agricultural and forestry. These areas include blocks of
forest or farmland that sustain resource industries,; provide critical wildlife
habitat and movement, outdoor recreation, flood storage, aquifer recharge, and
scenic beauty,; and contribute to economic well-being and quality of life.
Development in these areas may include housing and should be carefully
managed to promote the working landscape and rural economy, and address
regional goals, while protecting the agricultural and forest resource value.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, except that Sec. 1, 10 V.S.A.
§ 6001, shall take effect on December 31, 2026.
VT LEG #385171 v.2